Missouri, session 2026, SB1094.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 108.240 and 115.127, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 108.240 and 115.127, to read as follows:
108.240. 1. Before any general obligation bearer bond
or general obligation registered bond, hereafter issued by
any county, township, city, town, village or school district
or special road district or fire protection district or by
virtue of the provisions of chapters 243, 245, 248, and
sections 242.010 to 242.690 for any purpose whatever, shall
obtain validity or be negotiated:
(1) If such bonds are in bearer form, such bonds shall
first be presented to the state auditor, who, other
provisions of law notwithstanding, shall certify by manual
or facsimile endorsement of such bonds that all conditions
of the laws have been complied with in its issue, if that be
the case, and also that the conditions of the contract,
under which they were ordered to be issued, have also been
complied with and the evidence of that fact shall be filed
and preserved by the auditor. The state auditor may endorse
bearer bonds with the auditor's facsimile signature in lieu
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SCS SB 1094 2
of manual signature after filing the auditor's manual
signature, certified by the auditor under oath, with the
secretary of state; and
(2) If such bonds are in registered form, the
proceedings relating to the issuance of such registered
bonds shall first be presented to the state auditor, who
shall examine the same and shall issue a certificate that
such proceedings comply with all conditions of the laws, if
that be the case, and also that the conditions of the
contract, under which they were ordered to be issued, have
also been complied with, and the evidence of these facts
shall be filed and preserved by the auditor. The state
auditor shall also maintain the following information: the
name of the issuer of the bonds; the amount thereof; the
maturity dates thereof; the interest rates thereon; and the
provisions with respect to prepayment, if any.
2. Such bearer bonds after receiving the said
certificate of the auditor as herein provided and such
registered bonds after the issuance of the said certificate
as herein provided shall thereafter be held in every action,
suit or proceeding in which their validity is, or may be,
brought into question, prima facie, valid and binding
obligations, and in every action brought to enforce
collection of such bonds, the certificate of such auditor,
or a duly certified copy thereof, shall be admitted and
received in evidence of the validity of such bonds, together
with the coupons thereto attached if any; provided, the only
defense which can be offered against the validity of such
bonds shall be for forgery or fraud. But this section shall
not be construed to give validity to any such bonds as may
be issued in excess of the limit fixed by the constitution,
or contrary to its provisions, but all such bonds shall, to

SCS SB 1094 3
the extent of such excess, be held void; and provided
further, that the remedy of injunction shall also lie at the
instance of any taxpayer of the respective county, city,
town, village, township or school district or special road
district or fire protection district or drainage district or
levy district to prevent the registration of any bonds,
alleged to be illegally issued or funded.
3. For purposes of subsection 1 of this section, once
the time period set forth in section 115.557 has expired, if
no election contest has been brought, all conditions of
chapter 115 shall be deemed as having been complied with in
the issuance of the bond.
115.127. 1. Except as provided in subsection 4 of
this section, upon receipt of notice of a special election
to fill a vacancy submitted pursuant to subsection 2 of
section 115.125, the election authority shall cause legal
notice of the special election to be published in a
newspaper of general circulation in its jurisdiction. The
notice shall include the name of the officer or agency
calling the election, the date and time of the election, the
name of the office to be filled and the date by which
candidates must be selected or filed for the office. Within
one week prior to each special election to fill a vacancy
held in its jurisdiction, the election authority shall cause
legal notice of the election to be published in two
newspapers of different political faith and general
circulation in the jurisdiction. The legal notice shall
include the date and time of the election, the name of the
officer or agency calling the election and a sample ballot.
If there is only one newspaper of general circulation in the
jurisdiction, the notice shall be published in the newspaper
within one week prior to the election. If there are two or

SCS SB 1094 4
more newspapers of general circulation in the jurisdiction,
but no two of opposite political faith, the notice shall be
published in any two of the newspapers within one week prior
to the election.
2. Except as provided in subsections 1 and 4 of this
section and in sections 115.521, 115.549 and 115.593, the
election authority shall cause legal notice of each election
held in its jurisdiction to be published. The notice shall
be published in two newspapers of different political faith
and qualified pursuant to chapter 493 which are published
within the bounds of the area holding the election. If
there is only one so-qualified newspaper, then notice shall
be published in only one newspaper. If there is no
newspaper published within the bounds of the election area,
then the notice shall be published in two qualified
newspapers of different political faith serving the area.
Notice shall be published twice[, the first publication
occurring in the second week prior to the election, and the
second publication occurring] within [one week] six weeks
prior to the election. Each such legal notice shall include
the date and time of the election, the name of the officer
or agency calling the election and a sample ballot; and,
unless notice has been given as provided by section 115.129,
the second publication of notice of the election shall
include the location of polling places. The election
authority may provide any additional notice of the election
it deems desirable.
3. The election authority shall print the official
ballot as the same appears on the sample ballot, and no
candidate's name or ballot issue which appears on the sample
ballot or official printed ballot shall be stricken or
removed from the ballot except on death of a candidate or by

SCS SB 1094 5
court order, but in no event shall a candidate or issue be
stricken or removed from the ballot less than eight weeks
before the date of the election.
4. In lieu of causing legal notice to be published
twice in accordance with any of the provisions of this
chapter, the election authority [in jurisdictions which have
less than seven hundred fifty registered voters and in which
no newspaper qualified pursuant to chapter 493 is
published,] may cause legal notice to be mailed [during the
second week prior to the election, by first class mail,]
within six weeks prior to the election to each registered
voter at the voter's voting address and published once in
one or more newspapers in the county. An election authority
may exclude from this mailing any voter that is designated
as an inactive voter pursuant to section 115.193. All such
legal notices shall include the date and time of the
election, the location of the polling place, the name of the
officer or agency calling the election and a sample ballot.
5. If the opening date for filing a declaration of
candidacy for any office in a political subdivision or
special district is not required by law or charter, the
opening filing date shall be 8:00 a.m., the seventeenth
Tuesday prior to the election. If the closing date for
filing a declaration of candidacy for any office in a
political subdivision or special district is not required by
law or charter, the closing filing date shall be 5:00 p.m.,
the fourteenth Tuesday prior to the election. The political
subdivision or special district calling an election shall,
before the seventeenth Tuesday, prior to any election at
which offices are to be filled, notify the general public of
the opening filing date, the office or offices to be filled,
the proper place for filing and the closing filing date of

SCS SB 1094 6
the election. Such notification may be accomplished by
legal notice published in at least one newspaper of general
circulation in the political subdivision or special district.
6. Except as provided for in sections 115.247 and
115.359, if there is no additional cost for the printing or
reprinting of ballots or if the candidate agrees to pay any
printing or reprinting costs, a candidate who has filed for
an office or who has been duly nominated for an office may,
at any time after the certification of the notice of
election required in subsection 1 of section 115.125 but no
later than 5:00 p.m. on the eighth Tuesday before the
election, withdraw as a candidate pursuant to a court order,
which, except for good cause shown by the election authority
in opposition thereto, shall be freely given upon
application by the candidate to the circuit court of the
100 area of such candidate's residence.
✓